Maine, session 132, LD1429.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 22 MRSA §3174-JJ, as amended by PL 2019, c. 530, Pt. B, §1, is further
amended to read:
§3174-JJ. MaineCare reimbursement for ambulance services
The Except as provided in section 3174-PPP, the department shall reimburse for
ambulance services under MaineCare at a level that is not less than the average allowable
reimbursement rate under Medicare for such services or at the highest percent of that level
that is possible within resources appropriated for those purposes. Beginning March 1,
2015, the department shall reimburse for ambulance services under MaineCare at a level
that is not less than 65% of the average allowable reimbursement rate under Medicare for
such services. Beginning January 1, 2020, the department shall reimburse for ambulance
services under MaineCare at a level that is not less than the average allowable
reimbursement rate under Medicare for such services and shall reimburse for neonatal
transport services under MaineCare at the average rate for critical care transport services
under Medicare.
Sec. 2. 22 MRSA §3174-PPP is enacted to read:
§3174-PPP. Full reimbursement for emergency ambulance services
1. Definitions. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise indicates, the
following terms have the following meanings.
A. "Emergency ambulance services" means services provided, in response to an
emergency call for assistance, by:
(1) Municipal and quasi-municipal ambulance services;
(2) Fire department emergency medical services; and
(3) Private ambulance services, as applicable under MaineCare guidelines.
B. "Full rate" means the reimbursement rate determined to be usual, customary and
reasonable by the department and consistent with federal guidelines and applicable
state law.
2. Reimbursement requirements. The department shall reimburse providers of
emergency ambulance services for MaineCare members at the full rate for services eligible
under the MaineCare program.
3. Funding. The department shall identify and allocate sufficient funding from state
and federal sources to meet the reimbursement requirements under subsection 2. The
department shall prioritize the use of available federal matching funds to minimize the
effect on state resources.
4. Report. Beginning December 1, 2025, and annually thereafter, the department shall
submit a report to the joint standing committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction over
health and human services matters relating to reimbursement under this section. The report
must include, but is not limited to:
A. Data on the number of reimbursed emergency ambulance services;
B. The total amount of funds disbursed for reimbursed emergency ambulance services;
and
Page 1 - 132LR1045(01)

C. Recommendations for improving reimbursement policies and ensuring the
sustainability of emergency ambulance services statewide.
5. Rulemaking. The department shall adopt rules to implement this section. Rules
adopted pursuant to this subsection are routine technical rules as defined in Title 5, chapter
375, subchapter 2-A.